src/main/resources/Stemmer.sbl
    define Step_1 as (
	[substring] R1 among (
		'lozi'	
		'loga'			
		'lozima' 	(<-'log')
		'pesi'		
		'pesima'	(<-'peh')
		'vojci'		(<-'vojka')
		'bojci'		(<-'bojka')
		'jaci'		
		'jacima'	(<-'jak')
		'cajni'		(<-'cajan')
		'erni'		(<-'eran')
		'larni'		(<-'laran')
		'esni'		(<-'esan')
		'anjac'		(<-'anjca')
		'ajca'		
		'ajaca'		(<-'ajca')
		'ljaca'		
		'ljca'		(<-'ljac')
		'ejca'	
		'ejaca'		(<-'ejca')
		'ojca'	
		'ojaca'		(<-'ojac')
		'ajaka'		(<-'ajka')
		'ojaka'		(<-'ojka')
		'{sx}aca'	
		'{sx}ca'	(<-'{sx}ac')
		'sca'	 (R2 <-'sac')
		'inzima'	
		'inzi'		(<-'ing')
		'tvenici'	(<-'tvenik')
		'tetici'	
		'teticima'	(<-'tetika')
		'nstava'	(<-'nstvo')
		'nicima'	(<-'nik')
		'ticima'	(<-'tik')
		'zicima'	(<-'zik')
		'snici'		(<-'snik')
		'kuse'		(<-'kusi')
		'kusin'		(<-'kusan')
		'kustava'	(<-'kustvo')
		'du{sx}an'	(<-'du{sx}ni')
		'antan'		(<-'antni')
		'bilan'		(<-'bilni')
		'tilan'		(<-'tilni')
		'avilan'	(<-'avilni')
		'silan'		(<-'silni')
		'gilan'	(<-'gilni')
		'rilan'	(<-'rilni')
		'nilan'	(<-'nilni')
		'alan'	(<-'alni')
		'ozan'	(<-'ozni')
		'rave'	(<-'ravi')
		'stavan'	(<-'stavni')
		'pravan'	(<-'pravni')
		'tivan'		(<-'tivni')
		'sivan'		(<-'sivni')
		'atan'		(<-'atni')
		'enat'		(<-'enta')
		'tetan'		(<-'tetni')
		'pletan'	(<-'pletni')
		'{sx}ave'	(<-'{sx}avi')
		'save'	 (R2 <-'savi')
		'anat'	(<-'anta')
		'acak'	
		'acaka'	(<-'acka')
		'u{sx}ak'	(<-'u{sx}ka')
		'usak'	 (R2 <-'uska')
		'atak'	
		'ataka'	
		'atci'	
		'atcima'	(<-'atka')
		'etak'	
		'etaka'		(<-'etka')
		'itak'	
		'itaka'	
		'itci'		(<-'itka')
		'otak'	
		'otaka'		(<-'otka')
		'utak'	
		'utaka'	
		'utci'	
		'utcima'	(<-'utka')
		'eskan'	 (<-'eskna')
		'tican'	 (<-'ticni')
		'ojska'	 (<-'ojsci')
		'esama'	 (<-'esma')
		'metar'
		'metara'	(<-'metra')
		'centar'	
		'centara'	(<-'centra')
		'istar'	
		'istara'	(<-'istra')
		'o{sx}cu'	(<-'o{sx}ti')
		'oscu'	 (R2 <-'osti')
		'daba'	(<-'dba')
		'cima'	
		'ci' (<-'cka')
		'mac'	
		'maca'	(<-'mca')
		'naca'	
		'nac'	(<-'nca')
		'voljan'	(<-'voljni')
		'anaka'	(<-'anki')
		'vac'	
		'vaca'	(<-'vca')
		'saca'	
		'sac'	(<-'sca')
		'raca'	
		'rac'	(<-'rca')
		'aoca'	
		'alaca'	
		'alac'	(<-'alca')
		'elaca'	
		'elac'	(<-'elca')
		'olaca'	
		'olac'	
		'olce'	(<-'olca')
		'njac'	
		'njaca'	(<-'njca')
		'ekata'	
		'ekat'	(<-'ekta')
		'izam'	
		'izama'	(<-'izma')
		'jebe'	(<-'jebi')
		'baci'	(<-'baci')
		'a{sx}an'	(<-'a{sx}ni')
		'asan'	 (R2 <-'asni')
			        )
	)
	
	define Step_3 as (
		[substring] R1 among (
			'skijima'
'skijega'
'skijemu'
'skijem'
'skega'
'skemu'
'skem'
'skijim'
'skijih'
'skijoj'
'skijeg'
'skiji'
'skije'
'skija'
'skoga'
'skome'
'skomu'
'skima'
'skog'
'skom'
'skim'
'skih'
'skoj'
'ski'
'ske'
'sko'
'ska'
'sku'
(<-'sk')
'{sx}kijima'
'{sx}kijega'
'{sx}kijemu'
'{sx}kijem'
'{sx}kega'
'{sx}kemu'
'{sx}kem'
'{sx}kijim'
'{sx}kijih'
'{sx}kijoj'
'{sx}kijeg'
'{sx}kiji'
'{sx}kije'
'{sx}kija'
'{sx}koga'
'{sx}kome'
'{sx}komu'
'{sx}kima'
'{sx}kog'
'{sx}kom'
'{sx}kim'
'{sx}kih'
'{sx}koj'
'{sx}ki'
'{sx}ke'
'{sx}ko'
'{sx}ka'
'{sx}ku'
(<-'{sx}k')
'stvima'
'stvom'
'stvo'
'stva'
'stvu'
(<-'stv')
'{sx}tvima'
'{sx}tvom'
'{sx}tvo'
'{sx}tva'
'{sx}tvu'
(<-'{sx}tv')
'tanijama'
'tanijima'
'tanijom'
'tanija'
'taniju'
'tanije'
'taniji'
(<-'tanij')
'manijama'
'manijima'
'manijom'
'manija'
'maniju'
'manije'
'maniji'
(<-'manij')
'panijama'
'panijima'
'panijom'
'panija'
'paniju'
'panije'
'paniji'
(<-'panij')
'ranijama'
'ranijima'
'ranijom'
'ranija'
'raniju'
'ranije'
'raniji'
(<-'ranij')
'ganijama'
'ganijima'
'ganijom'
'ganija'
'ganiju'
'ganije'
'ganiji'
(<-'ganij')
'aninom'
'anina'
'aninu'
'anine'
'anima'
'anin'
'anom'
'anu'
'ani'
'ana'
'ane'
(<-'an')
'inima'
'inama'
'inom'
'ina'
'ine'
'ini'
'inu'
'ino'
(<-'in')
'onovima'
'onova'
'onove'
'onovi'
'onima'
'onom'
'ona'
'one'
'oni'
'onu'
(<-'on')
'nijima'
'nijega'
'nijemu'
'nijeg'
'nijem'
'nega'
'nemu'
'neg'
'nem'
'nijim'
'nijih'
'nijoj'
'niji'
'nije'
'nija'
'niju'
'nima'
'nome'
'nomu'
'noga'
'noj'
'nom'
'nih'
'nim'
'nog'
'no'
'ne'
'na'
'nu'
'ni'
(<-'n')
'a{cy}oga'
'a{cy}ome'
'a{cy}omu'
'a{cy}ega'
'a{cy}emu'
'a{cy}ima'
'a{cy}oj'
'a{cy}ih'
'a{cy}om'
'a{cy}eg'
'a{cy}em'
'a{cy}og'
'a{cy}uh'
'a{cy}im'
'a{cy}e'
'a{cy}a'
(<-'a{cy}')
'e{cy}oga'
'e{cy}ome'
'e{cy}omu'
'e{cy}ega'
'e{cy}emu'
'e{cy}ima'
'e{cy}oj'
'e{cy}ih'
'e{cy}om'
'e{cy}eg'
'e{cy}em'
'e{cy}og'
'e{cy}uh'
'e{cy}im'
'e{cy}e'
'e{cy}a'
(<-'e{cy}')
'u{cy}oga'
'u{cy}ome'
'u{cy}omu'
'u{cy}ega'
'u{cy}emu'
'u{cy}ima'
'u{cy}oj'
'u{cy}ih'
'u{cy}om'
'u{cy}eg'
'u{cy}em'
'u{cy}og'
'u{cy}uh'
'u{cy}im'
'u{cy}e'
'u{cy}a'
(<-'u{cy}')
'ugovima'
'ugovi'
'ugove'
'ugova'
(<-'ugov')
'ugama'
'ugom'
'uga'
'uge'
'ugi'
'ugu'
'ugo'
(<-'ug')
'logama'
'logom'
'loga'
'logu'
'loge'
(<-'log')
'govima'
'gama'
'govi'
'gove'
'gova'
'gom'
'ga'
'ge'
'gi'
'gu'
'go'
(<-'g')
'rarijem'
'rarija'
'rariju'
'rario'
(<-'rari')
'otijem'
'otija'
'otiju'
'otio'
(<-'oti')
'sijem'
'sija'
'siju'
'sio'
(<-'si')
'lijem'
'lija'
'liju'
'lio'
(<-'li')
'uju{cy}i'
'ujemo'
'ujete'
'ujmo'
'ujem'
'uje{sx}'
'uje'
'uju'
(<-'uj')
'cajevima'
'cajevi'
'cajeva'
'cajeve'
'cajama'
'cajima'
'cajem'
'caja'
'caje'
'caji'
'caju'
(<-'caj')
'{cx}ajevima'
'{cx}ajevi'
'{cx}ajeva'
'{cx}ajeve'
'{cx}ajama'
'{cx}ajima'
'{cx}ajem'
'{cx}aja'
'{cx}aje'
'{cx}aji'
'{cx}aju'
(<-'{cx}aj')
'{cy}ajevima'
'{cy}ajevi'
'{cy}ajeva'
'{cy}ajeve'
'{cy}ajama'
'{cy}ajima'
'{cy}ajem'
'{cy}aja'
'{cy}aje'
'{cy}aji'
'{cy}aju'
(<-'{cy}aj')
'{dx}ajevima'
'{dx}ajevi'
'{dx}ajeva'
'{dx}ajeve'
'{dx}ajama'
'{dx}ajima'
'{dx}ajem'
'{dx}aja'
'{dx}aje'
'{dx}aji'
'{dx}aju'
(<-'{dx}aj')
'lajevima'
'lajevi'
'lajeva'
'lajeve'
'lajama'
'lajima'
'lajem'
'laja'
'laje'
'laji'
'laju'
(<-'laj')
'rajevima'
'rajevi'
'rajeva'
'rajeve'
'rajama'
'rajima'
'rajem'
'raja'
'raje'
'raji'
'raju'
(<-'raj')
'bijima'
'bijama'
'bijom'
'bija'
'bije'
'biji'
'biju'
'bijo'
(<-'bij')
'cijima'
'cijama'
'cijom'
'cija'
'cije'
'ciji'
'ciju'
'cijo'
(<-'cij')
'dijima'
'dijama'
'dijom'
'dija'
'dije'
'diji'
'diju'
'dijo'
(<-'dij')
'lijima'
'lijama'
'lijom'
'lije'
'liji'
'lijo'
(<-'lij')
'nijama'
'nijom'
'nijo'
(<-'nij')
'mijima'
'mijama'
'mijom'
'mija'
'mije'
'miji'
'miju'
'mijo'
(<-'mij')
'{zx}ijima'
'{zx}ijama'
'{zx}ijom'
'{zx}ija'
'{zx}ije'
'{zx}iji'
'{zx}iju'
'{zx}ijo'
(<-'{zx}ij')
'gijima'
'gijama'
'gijom'
'gija'
'gije'
'giji'
'giju'
'gijo'
(<-'gij')
'fijima'
'fijama'
'fijom'
'fija'
'fije'
'fiji'
'fiju'
'fijo'
(<-'fij')
'pijima'
'pijama'
'pijom'
'pija'
'pije'
'piji'
'piju'
'pijo'
(<-'pij')
'rijima'
'rijama'
'rijom'
'rija'
'rije'
'riji'
'riju'
'rijo'
(<-'rij')
'sijima'
'sijama'
'sijom'
'sije'
'siji'
'sijo'
(<-'sij')
'tijima'
'tijama'
'tijom'
'tija'
'tije'
'tiji'
'tiju'
'tijo'
(<-'tij')
'zijima'
'zijama'
'zijom'
'zija'
'zije'
'ziji'
'ziju'
'zijo'
(<-'zij')
'nalima'
'nalama'
'nalom'
'nala'
'nale'
'nali'
'nalu'
'nalo'
(<-'nal')
'ijalima'
'ijalama'
'ijalom'
'ijala'
'ijale'
'ijali'
'ijalu'
'ijalo'
(<-'ijal')
'ozilima'
'ozilom'
'ozila'
'ozile'
'ozilu'
'ozili'
(<-'ozil')
'olovima'
'olovi'
'olova'
'olove'
(<-'olov')
'olima'
'olom'
'ola'
'olu'
'ole'
'oli'
(<-'ol')
'lemama'
'lemima'
'lemom'
'lema'
'leme'
'lemi'
'lemu'
'lemo'
(<-'lem')
'ramama'
'ramom'
'rama'
'rame'
'rami'
'ramu'
'ramo'
(<-'ram')
'arama'
'arima'
'arom'
'aru'
'ara'
'are'
'ari'
(<-'ar')
'drama'
'drima'
'drom'
'dru'
'dra'
'dre'
'dri'
(<-'dr')
'erama'
'erima'
'erom'
'eru'
'era'
'ere'
'eri'
(<-'er')
'orama'
'orima'
'orom'
'oru'
'ora'
'ore'
'ori'
(<-'or')
'esima'
'esom'
'ese'
'esa'
'esu'
(<-'es')
'isima'
'isom'
'ise'
'isa'
'isu'
(<-'is')
'ta{sx}ama'
'ta{sx}ima'
'ta{sx}om'
'ta{sx}em'
'ta{sx}a'
'ta{sx}u'
'ta{sx}i'
'ta{sx}e'
(<-'ta{sx}')
'na{sx}ama'
'na{sx}ima'
'na{sx}om'
'na{sx}em'
'na{sx}a'
'na{sx}u'
'na{sx}i'
'na{sx}e'
(<-'na{sx}')
'ja{sx}ama'
'ja{sx}ima'
'ja{sx}om'
'ja{sx}em'
'ja{sx}a'
'ja{sx}u'
'ja{sx}i'
'ja{sx}e'
(<-'ja{sx}')
'ka{sx}ama'
'ka{sx}ima'
'ka{sx}om'
'ka{sx}em'
'ka{sx}a'
'ka{sx}u'
'ka{sx}i'
'ka{sx}e'
(<-'ka{sx}')
'ba{sx}ama'
'ba{sx}ima'
'ba{sx}om'
'ba{sx}em'
'ba{sx}a'
'ba{sx}u'
'ba{sx}i'
'ba{sx}e'
(<-'ba{sx}')
'ga{sx}ama'
'ga{sx}ima'
'ga{sx}om'
'ga{sx}em'
'ga{sx}a'
'ga{sx}u'
'ga{sx}i'
'ga{sx}e'
(<-'ga{sx}')
'va{sx}ama'
'va{sx}ima'
'va{sx}om'
'va{sx}em'
'va{sx}a'
'va{sx}u'
'va{sx}i'
'va{sx}e'
(<-'va{sx}')
'e{sx}ima'
'e{sx}ama'
'e{sx}om'
'e{sx}em'
'e{sx}i'
'e{sx}e'
'e{sx}a'
'e{sx}u'
(<-'e{sx}')
'i{sx}ima'
'i{sx}ama'
'i{sx}om'
'i{sx}em'
'i{sx}i'
'i{sx}e'
'i{sx}a'
'i{sx}u'
(<-'i{sx}')
'ikatima'
'ikatom'
'ikata'
'ikate'
'ikati'
'ikatu'
'ikato'
(<-'ikat')
'latima'
'latom'
'lata'
'late'
'lati'
'latu'
'lato'
(<-'lat')
'etama'
'etima'
'etom'
'eta'
'ete'
'eti'
'etu'
'eto'
(<-'et')
'estima'
'estama'
'estom'
'esta'
'este'
'esti'
'estu'
'esto'
(<-'est')
'istima'
'istama'
'istom'
'ista'
'iste'
'isti'
'istu'
'isto'
(<-'ist')
'kstima'
'kstama'
'kstom'
'ksta'
'kste'
'ksti'
'kstu'
'ksto'
(<-'kst')
'ostima'
'ostama'
'ostom'
'osta'
'oste'
'osti'
'ostu'
'osto'
(<-'ost')
'i{sx}tima'
'i{sx}tem'
'i{sx}ta'
'i{sx}te'
'i{sx}tu'
(<-'i{sx}t')
'ovasmo'
'ovaste'
'ovahu'
'ovati'
'ova{sx}e'
'ovali'
'ovala'
'ovale'
'ovalo'
'ovat'
'ovah'
'ovao'
(<-'ova')
'avijemu'
'avijima'
'avijega'
'avijeg'
'avijem'
'avemu'
'avega'
'aveg'
'avem'
'avijim'
'avijih'
'avijoj'
'avoga'
'avome'
'avomu'
'avima'
'avama'
'aviji'
'avije'
'avija'
'aviju'
'avim'
'avih'
'avoj'
'avom'
'avog'
'avi'
'ava'
'avu'
'ave'
'avo'
(<-'av')
'evijemu'
'evijima'
'evijega'
'evijeg'
'evijem'
'evemu'
'evega'
'eveg'
'evem'
'evijim'
'evijih'
'evijoj'
'evoga'
'evome'
'evomu'
'evima'
'evama'
'eviji'
'evije'
'evija'
'eviju'
'evim'
'evih'
'evoj'
'evom'
'evog'
'evi'
'eva'
'evu'
'eve'
'evo'
(<-'ev')
'ivijemu'
'ivijima'
'ivijega'
'ivijeg'
'ivijem'
'ivemu'
'ivega'
'iveg'
'ivem'
'ivijim'
'ivijih'
'ivijoj'
'ivoga'
'ivome'
'ivomu'
'ivima'
'ivama'
'iviji'
'ivije'
'ivija'
'iviju'
'ivim'
'ivih'
'ivoj'
'ivom'
'ivog'
'ivi'
'iva'
'ivu'
'ive'
'ivo'
(<-'iv')
'ovijemu'
'ovijima'
'ovijega'
'ovijeg'
'ovijem'
'ovemu'
'ovega'
'oveg'
'ovijim'
'ovijih'
'ovijoj'
'ovoga'
'ovome'
'ovomu'
'ovima'
'oviji'
'ovije'
'ovija'
'oviju'
'ovim'
'ovih'
'ovoj'
'ovom'
'ovog'
'ovi'
'ova'
'ovu'
'ove'
'ovo'
(<-'ov')
'movima'
'movom'
'mova'
'movu'
'move'
'movi'
(<-'mov')
'lovima'
'lovom'
'lova'
'lovu'
'love'
'lovi'
(<-'lov')
'elijemu'
'elijima'
'elijega'
'elijeg'
'elijem'
'elemu'
'elega'
'eleg'
'elem'
'elijim'
'elijih'
'elijoj'
'eloga'
'elome'
'elomu'
'elima'
'eliji'
'elije'
'elija'
'eliju'
'elim'
'elih'
'eloj'
'elom'
'elog'
'eli'
'ela'
'elu'
'ele'
'elo'
(<-'el')
'anjijemu'
'anjijima'
'anjijega'
'anjijeg'
'anjijem'
'anjemu'
'anjega'
'anjeg'
'anjem'
'anjijim'
'anjijih'
'anjijoj'
'anjoga'
'anjome'
'anjomu'
'anjima'
'anjiji'
'anjije'
'anjija'
'anjiju'
'anjim'
'anjih'
'anjoj'
'anjom'
'anjog'
'anja'
'anje'
'anji'
'anjo'
'anju'
(<-'anj')
'enjijemu'
'enjijima'
'enjijega'
'enjijeg'
'enjijem'
'enjemu'
'enjega'
'enjeg'
'enjem'
'enjijim'
'enjijih'
'enjijoj'
'enjoga'
'enjome'
'enjomu'
'enjima'
'enjiji'
'enjije'
'enjija'
'enjiju'
'enjim'
'enjih'
'enjoj'
'enjom'
'enjog'
'enja'
'enje'
'enji'
'enjo'
'enju'
(<-'enj')
'{sx}njijemu'
'{sx}njijima'
'{sx}njijega'
'{sx}njijeg'
'{sx}njijem'
'{sx}njemu'
'{sx}njega'
'{sx}njeg'
'{sx}njem'
'{sx}njijim'
'{sx}njijih'
'{sx}njijoj'
'{sx}njoga'
'{sx}njome'
'{sx}njomu'
'{sx}njima'
'{sx}njiji'
'{sx}njije'
'{sx}njija'
'{sx}njiju'
'{sx}njim'
'{sx}njih'
'{sx}njoj'
'{sx}njom'
'{sx}njog'
'{sx}nja'
'{sx}nje'
'{sx}nji'
'{sx}njo'
'{sx}nju'
(<-'{sx}nj')
'anemu'
'anega'
'aneg'
'anem'
(<-'an')
'enemu'
'enega'
'eneg'
'enem'
(<-'en')
'{sx}nemu'
'{sx}nega'
'{sx}neg'
'{sx}nem'
(<-'{sx}n')
'{cx}inama'
'{cx}inome'
'{cx}inomu'
'{cx}inoga'
'{cx}inima'
'{cx}inog'
'{cx}inom'
'{cx}inim'
'{cx}inih'
'{cx}inoj'
'{cx}ina'
'{cx}inu'
'{cx}ini'
'{cx}ino'
'{cx}ine'
(<-'{cx}in')
'ro{sx}iv{sx}i'
'ro{sx}ismo'
'ro{sx}iste'
'ro{sx}i{sx}e'
'ro{sx}imo'
'ro{sx}ite'
'ro{sx}iti'
'ro{sx}ili'
'ro{sx}ila'
'ro{sx}ilo'
'ro{sx}ile'
'ro{sx}im'
'ro{sx}i{sx}'
'ro{sx}it'
'ro{sx}ih'
'ro{sx}io'
(<-'ro{sx}i')
'o{sx}ijemu'
'o{sx}ijima'
'o{sx}ijega'
'o{sx}ijeg'
'o{sx}ijem'
'o{sx}emu'
'o{sx}ega'
'o{sx}eg'
'o{sx}em'
'o{sx}ijim'
'o{sx}ijih'
'o{sx}ijoj'
'o{sx}oga'
'o{sx}ome'
'o{sx}omu'
'o{sx}ima'
'o{sx}iji'
'o{sx}ije'
'o{sx}ija'
'o{sx}iju'
'o{sx}im'
'o{sx}ih'
'o{sx}oj'
'o{sx}om'
'o{sx}og'
'o{sx}i'
'o{sx}a'
'o{sx}u'
